Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3415
Incapacity of principal; dispute; hearing.

If a dispute arises as to whether the principal is incapable, a petition may be filed with the county court in the county in which the principal resides or is located requesting the court's determination as to whether the principal is incapable of making health care decisions. If such a petition is filed, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the principal. The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition within seven days after the court's receipt of the petition. Within seven days after the hearing, the court shall issue its determination. If the court determines that the principal is incapable, the authority, rights, and responsibilities of the principal's attorney in fact shall become effective. If the court determines that the principal is not incapable, the authority, rights, and responsibilities of the attorney in fact shall not become effective.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 15.